California statutes. Penal Code
795.

The jurisdiction of a violation of Sections 412, 413, or 414, or a conspiracy to violate any of said sections, is in any competent court within the jurisdictional territory of which:

First. Any act is done towards the commission of the offense; or,

Second. The offender passed, whether into, out of, or through it, to commit the offense; or,

Third. The offender is arrested.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1674.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Time of Commencing Criminal Actions [799. - 805.]

799.

(a) Prosecution for an offense punishable by death or by imprisonment in the state prison for life or for life without the possibility of parole, or for the embezzlement of public money, may be commenced at any time.

(b) (1) Prosecution for a felony offense described in paragraph (1), (2), (3), (4), (6), or (7) of subdivision (a) of Section 261, paragraph (1), (2), (3), (4), or (5) of subdivision (a) of former Section 262, Section 264.1, paragraph (2) or (3) of subdivision (c) of, or subdivision (d), (f), (g), (i), or (k) of, Section 286, paragraph (2) or (3) of subdivision (c) of, or subdivision (d), (f), (g), (i), or (k) of, Section 287 or former Section 288a, subdivision (a) of Section 288 involving substantial sexual conduct as defined in
 subdivision (b) of Section 1203.066, subdivision (b) of Section 288, Section 288.5, or subdivision (a), (b), (d), (e), or (g) of Section 289 may be commenced at any time.

(2) This subdivision applies to crimes that were committed on or after January 1, 2017, and to crimes for which the statute of limitations that was in effect prior to January 1, 2017, has not run as of January 1, 2017.

(c) This section applies when the defendant was a minor at the time of the commission of the offense and the prosecuting attorney could have petitioned the court for a fitness hearing pursuant to Section 707 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 626, Sec. 38.   (AB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

800.

Except as provided in Section 799, prosecution for an offense punishable by imprisonment in the state prison for eight years or more or by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 for eight years or more shall be commenced within six years after commission of the offense.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 24) by Stats. 2011, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 12, Sec. 11.   (AB 17 1x)   Effective September 21, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 46 of Ch. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

801.

Except as provided in Sections 799 and 800, prosecution for an offense punishable by imprisonment in the state prison or pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 shall be commenced within three years after commission of the offense.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 446.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

801.1.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding any other limitation of time described in this chapter, prosecution for a felony offense described in Section 261, 286, 287, 288, 288.5, or 289, or former Section 288a, or Section 289.5, as enacted by Chapter 293 of the Statutes of 1991 relating to penetration by an unknown object, that is alleged to have been committed when the victim was under 18 years of age, may be commenced any time prior to the victim’s 40th birthday.

(2) Paragraph (1) shall only apply to crimes that were committed on or after January 1, 2015, or for which the statute of limitations that was in effect prior to January 1, 2015, has not run as of January 1, 2015.

(3) If the requirements in paragraph (1) are not met, the prosecuting agency may nevertheless provide victim assistance to the person, including support with pursuing restorative justice.

(b) Notwithstanding any other limitation of time described in this chapter, if either subdivision (a) of this section or subdivision (b) of Section 799 does not apply, prosecution for a felony offense described in subdivision (c) of Section 290 shall be commenced within 10 years after commission of the offense.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 825, Sec. 1.   (AB 2295)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

801.2.

Notwithstanding any other limitation of time prescribed in this chapter, prosecution for a violation of subdivision (b) of Section 311.4 shall commence within 10 years of the date of production of the pornographic material.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 337, Sec. 35.   Effective September 20, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

801.5.

Notwithstanding Section 801 or any other provision of law, prosecution for any offense described in subdivision (c) of Section 803 shall be commenced within four years after discovery of the commission of the offense, or within four years after the completion of the offense, whichever is later.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 704, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

801.6.

Notwithstanding any other limitation of time described in this chapter, prosecution for any offense proscribed by Section 368, except for a violation of any provision of law proscribing theft or embezzlement, may be filed at any time within five years from the date of occurrence of such offense.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 587, Sec. 1.   (AB 2274)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

801.7.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 801 or any other law, prosecution for a felony offense described in Section 502 shall be commenced within three years after discovery of the commission of the offense, or within three years after the offense could have reasonably been discovered, provided, however, that in any case a complaint shall not be filed more than
 six years after the commission of the offense.

(b) This section applies to crimes that are committed on or after January 1, 2022, and to crimes for which the statute of limitations that was in effect prior to January 1, 2022, has not elapsed as of January 1, 2022.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 206, Sec. 1.   (AB 1247)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

801.8.

(a) Notwithstanding any other limitation of time described in this chapter, prosecution for the failure of a mandated reporter to report an incident under Section 11166 known or reasonably suspected by the mandated reporter to be sexual assault as defined in Section 11165.1, may be filed at any time within five years from the date of occurrence of such offense.

(b) Notwithstanding any other limitation of time described in this chapter, prosecution for the failure of a mandated reporter to report an incident under Section 11166 known or reasonably suspected by the mandated reporter to be child abuse or
 severe neglect that is not described in subdivision (a), may be filed within one year of the discovery of the offense, but in no case later than four
 years after the commission of the offense.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 587, Sec. 2.   (AB 2274)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

802.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), (c), (d), or (e), prosecution for an offense not punishable by death or imprisonment in the state prison or pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 shall be commenced within one year after commission of the offense.

(b) Prosecution for a misdemeanor violation of Section 647.6 or former Section 647a committed with or upon a minor under 14 years of age shall be commenced within three years after commission of the offense.

(c) Prosecution of a misdemeanor violation of Section 729 of the Business and Professions Code shall be commenced within two years after commission of
 the offense.

(d) Prosecution of a misdemeanor violation of Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 7000) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code shall be commenced as follows:

(1) With respect to Sections 7028.17, 7068.5, and 7068.7 of the Business and Professions Code, within one year of the commission of the offense.

(2) With respect to Sections 7027.1, 7028.1, 7028.15, 7118.4, 7118.5, 7118.6, 7126, 7153, 7156, 7157, 7158, 7159.5 (licensee only), 7159.14 (licensee only), 7161, and 7189 of the Business and Professions Code, within two years of the commission of the offense.

(3) With respect to Sections 7027.3 and 7028.16 of the Business and
 Professions Code, within three years of the commission of the offense.

(4) With respect to Sections 7028, 7159.5 (nonlicensee only), and 7159.14 (nonlicensee only) of the Business and Professions Code, within four years of the commission of the offense.

(e) (1) Prosecution for a misdemeanor violation of Section 6126, 10085.6, 10139, or 10147.6 of the Business and Professions Code or Section 2944.6 or 2944.7 of the Civil Code shall be commenced within three years after discovery of the commission of the offense, or within three years after completion of the offense, whichever is
 later.

(2) Prosecution for a misdemeanor violation of subdivisions (b) and (e) of Section 119 of the Business and Professions Code, by parties licensed or subject to licensure pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 7000) of Division 3 of that code, within three years after discovery of the commission of the offense, or within three years after completion of the offense, whichever is later.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 403, Sec. 2.   (SB 601)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

802.5.

Notwithstanding Section 802 or any other provision of law, prosecution for the offense described in Section 18897.93 of the Business and Professions Code shall be commenced within three years after discovery of the commission of the offense.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 146, Sec. 2.   (SB 238)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

803.

(a) Except as provided in this section, a limitation of time prescribed in this chapter is not tolled or extended for any reason.

(b) The time during which prosecution of the same person for the same conduct is pending in a court of this state is not a part of a limitation of time prescribed in this chapter.

(c) A limitation of time prescribed in this chapter does not commence to run until the discovery of an offense described in this subdivision. This subdivision applies to an offense punishable by imprisonment in the state prison or imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170, a material element of which is fraud or breach of a fiduciary obligation, the commission of the crimes of theft or
 embezzlement upon an elder or dependent adult, or the basis of which is misconduct in office by a public officer, employee, or appointee, including, but not limited to, the following offenses:

(1) Grand theft of any type, forgery, falsification of public records, or acceptance of, or asking, receiving, or agreeing to receive, a bribe, by a public official or a public employee, including, but not limited to, a violation of Section 68, 86, or 93.

(2) A violation of Section 72, 118, 118a, 132, 134, or 186.10.

(3) A violation of Section 25540, of any type, or Section 25541 of the Corporations Code.

(4) A violation of Section 1090 or 27443 of the Government Code.

(5) Felony welfare fraud or
 Medi-Cal fraud in violation of Section 11483 or 14107 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(6) Felony insurance fraud in violation of Section 548 or 550 of this code or former Section 1871.1, or Section 1871.4, of the Insurance Code.

(7) A violation of Section 580, 581, 582, 583, or 584 of the Business and Professions Code.

(8) A violation of Section 22430 of the Business and Professions Code.

(9) A violation of Section 103800 of the Health and Safety Code.

(10) A violation of Section 529a.

(11) A violation of subdivision (d) or (e) of Section 368.

(d) If the
 defendant is out of the state when or after the offense is committed, the prosecution may be commenced as provided in Section 804 within the limitations of time prescribed by this chapter, and no time up to a maximum of three years during which the defendant is not within the state shall be a part of those limitations.

(e) A limitation of time prescribed in this chapter does not commence to run until the offense has been discovered, or could have reasonably been discovered, with regard to offenses under Division 7 (commencing with Section 13000) of the Water Code, under Chapter 6.5 (commencing with Section 25100) or Chapter 6.7 (commencing with Section 25280) of Division 20 of, or Part 4 (commencing with Section 41500) of Division 26 of, or Part 2 (commencing with Section 78000) of Division 45 of, the Health and Safety Code, or under Section 386, or offenses under Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 2000) of Division 2 of, Chapter 9 (commencing
 with Section 4000) of Division 2 of, Section 6126 of, Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 7301) of Division 3 of, or Chapter 19.5 (commencing with Section 22440) of Division 8 of, the Business and Professions Code.

(f) (1) Notwithstanding any other limitation of time described in this chapter, if subdivision (b) of Section 799 does not apply, a criminal complaint may be filed within one year of the date of a report to a California law enforcement agency by a person of any age alleging that the person, while under 18 years of age, was the victim of a crime described in Section 261, 286, 287, 288, 288.5, or 289, former Section 288a, or Section 289.5, as enacted by Chapter 293 of the Statutes of 1991 relating to penetration by an unknown object.

(2) This subdivision applies only if all of the following occur:

(A) The limitation period specified in Section 800, 801, or 801.1, whichever is later, has expired.

(B) The crime involved substantial sexual conduct, as described in subdivision (b) of Section 1203.066, excluding masturbation that is not mutual.

(C) There is independent evidence that corroborates the victim’s allegation. If the victim was 21 years of age or older at the time of the report, the independent evidence shall clearly and convincingly corroborate the victim’s allegation.

(3) Evidence shall not be used to corroborate the victim’s allegation if that evidence would otherwise be inadmissible during trial. Independent evidence excludes the opinions of mental health professionals.

(4) (A) In a criminal
 investigation involving any of the crimes listed in paragraph (1) committed against a child, if the applicable limitations period has not expired, that period shall be tolled from the time a party initiates litigation challenging a grand jury subpoena until the end of the litigation, including any associated writ or appellate proceeding, or until the final disclosure of evidence to the investigating or prosecuting agency, if that disclosure is ordered pursuant to the subpoena after the litigation.

(B) This subdivision does not affect the definition or applicability of any evidentiary privilege.

(C) This subdivision shall not apply if a court finds that the grand jury subpoena was issued or caused to be issued in bad faith.

(g) (1) Notwithstanding any other limitation of time described in this
 chapter, a criminal complaint may be filed within one year of the date on which the identity of the suspect is conclusively established by DNA testing, if both of the following conditions are met:

(A) The crime is one that is described in subdivision (c) of Section 290.

(B) The offense was committed before January 1, 2001, and biological evidence collected in connection with the offense is analyzed for DNA type no later than January 1, 2004, or the offense was committed on or after January 1, 2001, and biological evidence collected in connection with the offense is analyzed for DNA type no later than two years from the date of the offense.

(2) For purposes of this section, “DNA” means deoxyribonucleic acid.

(h) For any crime, the proof of which depends
 substantially upon evidence that was seized under a warrant, but which is unavailable to the prosecuting authority under the procedures described in People v. Superior Court (Laff) (2001) 25 Cal.4th 703, People v. Superior Court (Bauman & Rose) (1995) 37 Cal.App.4th 1757, or subdivision (c) of Section 1524, relating to claims of evidentiary privilege or attorney work product, the limitation of time prescribed in this chapter shall be tolled from the time of the seizure until final disclosure of the evidence to the prosecuting authority. This section does not otherwise affect the definition or applicability of any evidentiary privilege or attorney work product.

(i) (1) Notwithstanding any other limitation of time described in this chapter, a criminal complaint may be filed within one year of the date on which a hidden recording is discovered related to a violation of paragraph (2) or (3) of subdivision (j) of Section
 647.

(2) Notwithstanding any other limitation of time described in this chapter, a criminal complaint may be filed within one year of the date on which it is discovered that, but not more than four years after, an image was intentionally distributed in violation of paragraph (4) of subdivision (j) of Section 647.

(j) (1) Notwithstanding any other limitation of time described in this chapter, if a person flees the scene of an accident that caused death or permanent, serious injury, as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 20001 of the Vehicle Code, a criminal complaint brought pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 20001 of the Vehicle Code may be filed within the applicable time period described in Section 801 or 802 or one year after the person is initially identified by law enforcement as a suspect in the commission of the offense,
 whichever is later, but in no case later than six years after the commission of the offense.

(2) If, after committing the crime described in paragraph (1), a person is out of the state for the purpose of evading prosecution, the statute of limitations may be tolled for up to three years during any time the person is out of the state.

(k) Notwithstanding any other limitation of time described in this chapter, if a person flees the scene of an accident, a criminal complaint brought pursuant to paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 192 may be filed within the applicable time period described in Section 801 or 802, or one year after the person is initially identified by law enforcement as a suspect in the commission of that offense, whichever is later, but in no case later than six years after the commission of the offense.

(l) A limitation of time prescribed in this chapter does not commence to run until the discovery of an offense involving the offering or giving of a bribe to a public official or public employee, including, but not limited to, a violation of Section 67, 67.5, 85, 92, or 165, or Section 35230 or 72530 of the Education Code.

(m) Notwithstanding any other limitation of time prescribed in this chapter, if a person actively conceals or attempts to conceal an accidental death in violation of Section 152, a criminal complaint may be filed within one year after the person is initially identified by law enforcement as a suspect in the commission of that offense, provided, however, that in any case a complaint may not be filed more than four years after the commission of the offense.

(n) (1) Notwithstanding any
 other limitation of time described in this chapter, a criminal complaint brought pursuant to a violation of Section 367g may be filed within one year of the discovery of the offense or within one year after the offense could have reasonably been discovered.

(2) This subdivision applies to crimes that were committed on or after January 1, 2021, and to crimes for which the statute of limitations that was in effect before January 1, 2021, has not run as of January 1, 2021.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 67, Sec. 156.   (AB 1170)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

803.5.

With respect to a violation of Section 115 or 530.5, a limitation of time prescribed in this chapter does not commence to run until the discovery of the offense.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 468, Sec. 10.5.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

803.6.

(a) If more than one time period described in this chapter applies, the time for commencing an action shall be governed by that period that expires the latest in time.

(b) Any change in the time period for the commencement of prosecution described in this chapter applies to any crime if prosecution for the crime was not barred on the effective date of the change by the statute of limitations in effect immediately prior to the effective date of the change.

(c) This section is declaratory of existing law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 368, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

803.7.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, prosecution for a violation of Section 273.5 may be commenced within seven years of the crime.

(b) This section applies to crimes that are committed on or after January 1, 2025, and to crimes for which the statute of limitations that was in effect prior to January 1,
 2025, has not elapsed as of January 1, 2025.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 653, Sec. 2.   (SB 690)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

804.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, for the purpose of this chapter, prosecution for an offense is commenced when any of the following occurs:

(a) An indictment or information is filed.

(b) A complaint is filed charging a misdemeanor or infraction.

(c) The defendant is arraigned on a complaint that charges the defendant with a felony.

(d) An arrest warrant or bench warrant is issued, provided the warrant names or describes the defendant with the same degree of particularity required for an indictment, information, or complaint.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 110, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

805.

For the purpose of determining the applicable limitation of time pursuant to this chapter:

(a) An offense is deemed punishable by the maximum punishment prescribed by statute for the offense, regardless of the punishment actually sought or imposed. Any enhancement of punishment prescribed by statute shall be disregarded in determining the maximum punishment prescribed by statute for an offense.

(b) The limitation of time applicable to an offense that is necessarily included within a greater offense is the limitation of time applicable to the lesser included offense, regardless of the limitation of time applicable to the greater offense.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1270, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Complaints Before Magistrates [806. - 810.]

806.

A proceeding for the examination before a magistrate of a person on a charge of a felony must be commenced by written complaint under oath subscribed by the complainant and filed with the magistrate. Such complaint may be verified on information and belief. When the complaint is used as a pleading to which the defendant pleads guilty under Section 859a of this code, the complaint shall contain the same allegations, including the charge of prior conviction or convictions of crime, as are required for indictments and informations and, wherever applicable, shall be construed and shall have substantially the same effect as provided in this code for indictments and informations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 931, Sec. 359.   Effective September 28, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

807.

A magistrate is an officer having power to issue a warrant for the arrest of a person charged with a public offense.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

808.

The following persons are magistrates:

(a) The judges of the Supreme Court.

(b) The judges of the courts of appeal.

(c) The judges of the superior courts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 62, Sec. 229.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

809.

The night-time commissioner of the Santa Clara County Superior Court shall be considered a magistrate for the purpose of conducting prompt probable cause hearings for persons arrested without an arrest warrant as mandated by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 909, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

810.

(a) The presiding judge of the superior court in a county shall, as often as is necessary, designate on a schedule not less than one judge of the court to be reasonably available on call as a magistrate for the setting of orders for discharge from actual custody upon bail, the issuance of search warrants, and for such other matters as may by the magistrate be deemed appropriate, at all times when a court is not in session in the county.

(b) The officer in charge of a jail, or a person the officer designates, in which an arrested person is held in custody shall assist the arrested person or the arrested person’s attorney in contacting the magistrate on call as soon as possible for the purpose of obtaining release on bail.

(c) Any telephone call made pursuant to this section by an arrested person while in custody or by such person’s attorney shall not count or be considered as a telephone call for purposes of Section 851.5 of the Penal Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 784, Sec. 530.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. The Warrant of Arrest [813. - 829.]

813.

(a) When a complaint is filed with a magistrate charging a felony originally triable in the superior court of the county in which he or she sits, if, and only if, the magistrate is satisfied from the complaint that the offense complained of has been committed and that there is reasonable ground to believe that the defendant has committed it, the magistrate shall issue a warrant for the arrest of the defendant, except that, upon the request of the prosecutor, a summons instead of an arrest warrant shall be issued.

(b) A summons issued pursuant to this section shall be in substantially the same form as an arrest warrant and shall contain all of the following:

(1) The name of the defendant.

(2) The date and time the summons was issued.

(3) The city or county where the summons was issued.

(4) The signature of the magistrate, judge, justice, or other issuing authority who is issuing the summons with the title of his or her office and the name of the court or other issuing agency.

(5) The offense or offenses with which the defendant is charged.

(6) The time and place at which the
 defendant is to appear.

(7) Notification that the defendant is to complete the booking process on or before his or her first court appearance, as well as instructions for the defendant on completing the booking process.

(8) A provision for certification by the booking agency that the defendant has completed the booking process which shall be presented to the court by the defendant as proof of booking.

(c) If a defendant has been properly served with a summons and thereafter fails to appear at the designated time and place, a bench warrant for arrest shall issue. In the absence of proof of actual receipt of the summons by the defendant, a failure to appear shall not be used in any future proceeding.

(d) A defendant who responds to a summons issued
 pursuant to this section and who has not been booked as provided in subdivision (b) shall be ordered by the court to complete the booking process.

(e) The prosecutor shall not request the issuance of a summons in lieu of an arrest warrant as provided in this section under any of the following circumstances:

(1) The offense charged involves violence.

(2) The offense charged involves a firearm.

(3) The offense charged involves resisting arrest.

(4) There are one or more outstanding arrest warrants for the person.

(5) The prosecution of the offense or offenses with which the person is charged, or the prosecution of any other
 offense or offenses would be jeopardized.

(6) There is a reasonable likelihood that the offense or offenses would continue or resume, or that the safety of persons or property would be imminently endangered.

(7) There is reason to believe that the person would not appear at the time and place specified in the summons.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 931, Sec. 362.   Effective September 28, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

814.

A warrant of arrest issued under Section 813 may be in substantially the following form:

County of ____

The people of the State of California to any peace officer of said State:

Complaint on oath having this day been laid before me that the crime of ____ (designating it generally) has been committed and accusing ____ (naming defendant) thereof, you are therefore commanded forthwith to arrest the above named defendant and bring him or her before me at ____ (naming the place), or in case of my absence or inability to act, before the nearest or most accessible magistrate in this county.Dated at (place) this day of , 
 20__. (Signature and full official title of magistrate.)

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 391.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

815.

A warrant of arrest shall specify the name of the defendant or, if it is unknown to the magistrate, judge, justice, or other issuing authority, the defendant may be designated therein by any name. It shall also state the time of issuing it, and the city or county where it is issued, and shall be signed by the magistrate, judge, justice, or other issuing authority issuing it with the title of his office and the name of the court or other issuing agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1490.)
-------------------------------------------

815a.

At the time of issuing a warrant of arrest, the magistrate shall fix the amount of bail which in his judgment in accordance with the provisions of section 1275 will be reasonable and sufficient for the appearance of the defendant following his arrest, if the offense is bailable, and said magistrate shall endorse upon said warrant a statement signed by him, with the name of his office, dated at the county, city or town where it is made to the following effect “The defendant is to be admitted to bail in the sum of ____ dollars” (stating the amount).

(History: Added by Stats. 1933, Ch. 242.)
-------------------------------------------

816.

A warrant of arrest shall be directed generally to any peace officer, or to any public officer or employee authorized to serve process where the warrant is for a violation of a statute or ordinance which such person has the duty to enforce, in the state, and may be executed by any of those officers to whom it may be delivered.

When a warrant of arrest has been delivered to a peace officer and the person named in the warrant is otherwise lawfully in the custody of the peace officer, the warrant may be executed by the peace officer or by any clerk of a city or county jail authorized to act and acting under the peace
 officer’s direction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1205, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

816a.

A summons issued pursuant to Section 813 shall be served by any peace officer, or any public officer or employee authorized to serve process when the summons is for a violation of a statute or ordinance which that person has the duty to enforce, within the state. Upon service of the summons, the officer or employee shall deliver one copy of the summons to the defendant and shall file a duplicate copy with the magistrate before whom the defendant is to appear.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 664, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

817.

(a) (1) Before issuing an arrest warrant, the magistrate shall examine a declaration of probable cause made by a peace officer or, when the defendant is a peace officer, an employee of a public prosecutor’s office of this state, in accordance with subdivisions (b), (c), and (d), as applicable. The magistrate shall issue a warrant of
 probable cause for the arrest of the defendant only if the magistrate is satisfied after reviewing the declaration that there exists probable cause that the offense described in the declaration has been committed and that the defendant described therein has committed the offense.

(2) The warrant of probable cause for arrest shall not begin a complaint process pursuant to Section 740 or 813. The warrant of probable cause for arrest shall have the same authority for service as set forth in Section 840 and the same time limitations as that of an arrest warrant issued pursuant to Section 813.

(b) The declaration in support of the warrant of probable cause for arrest shall be a sworn statement made in writing. If the declarant transmits the proposed warrant and all affidavits and supporting
 documents to the magistrate using facsimile transmission equipment, email, or computer server, the conditions in subdivision (d) shall apply.

(c) In lieu of the written declaration required in subdivision (b), the magistrate may accept an oral statement made under penalty of perjury and recorded and transcribed. The transcribed statement shall be deemed to be the declaration for the purposes of this section. The recording of the sworn oral statement and the transcribed statement shall be certified by the magistrate receiving it and shall be filed with the clerk of the court. In the alternative, the sworn oral statement may be recorded by a certified court reporter who shall certify the transcript of the statement, after which the magistrate receiving it shall certify the transcript, which shall be filed with the clerk of the court.

(d) (1) The declarant shall sign under penalty of perjury their declaration in support of the warrant of probable cause for arrest. The declarant’s signature shall be in the form of a digital signature or electronic signature if email or computer server is used for transmission to the magistrate. The proposed warrant and all supporting declarations and attachments shall be transmitted to the magistrate utilizing facsimile transmission equipment, email, or computer server.

(2) The magistrate shall verify that all the pages sent have been received, that all the pages are legible, and that the declarant’s signature, digital signature, or electronic signature is genuine.

(e) A warrant of probable cause for
 arrest shall contain the information required pursuant to Sections 815 and 815a.

(f) A warrant of probable cause for arrest may be in substantially the following form:County of ______, State of California.The people of the State of California to any peace officer of the STATE:Proof by declaration under penalty of perjury having been made this day to me by (name of declarant),I find that there is probable cause to believe that the crime(s)of (designate the crime/s)has (have) been committed by the defendant named and described below.Therefore, you are commanded to arrest(name of defendant) and to bring the defendantbefore any magistrate in _______ County pursuant to Sections 821, 825, 826, and 848 of the Penal Code.Defendant is admitted to bail in the amount of______dollars ($______).Time Issued:(Signature of the Judge)Dated:Judge of theCourt(g) Before
 issuing a warrant, the magistrate may examine under oath the person seeking the warrant and any witness the person may produce, take the written declaration of the person or witness, and cause the person or witness to subscribe the declaration. If the magistrate decides to issue the warrant, the magistrate shall do all of the following:

(1) Sign the warrant. The magistrate’s signature may be in the form of a digital signature or electronic signature if email or computer server was used for transmission to the magistrate.

(2) Note on the warrant the date and time of the issuance of the warrant.

(3) Transmit via facsimile transmission equipment, email, or computer server the signed warrant to the declarant. The warrant, signed
 by the magistrate and received by the declarant, shall be deemed to be the original warrant.

(h) An original warrant of probable cause for arrest or the duplicate original warrant of probable cause for arrest is sufficient for booking a defendant into custody.

(i) After the defendant named in the warrant of probable cause for arrest has been taken into custody, the agency that obtained the warrant shall file a “certificate of service” with the clerk of the issuing court. The certificate of service shall contain all of the following:

(1) The date and time of service.

(2) The name of the defendant arrested.

(3) The location of the arrest.

(4) The location where the defendant was incarcerated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 20, Sec. 1.   (AB 127)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

817.5.

(a) On or after June 30, 2001, upon the issuance of any arrest warrant, the issuing law enforcement agency may enter the warrant information into the Department of Justice’s Wanted Persons System.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any state or local governmental agency shall, upon request, provide to the Department of Justice, a court, or any California law enforcement agency, the address of any person represented by the department, the court, or the law enforcement
 agency to be a person for whom there is an outstanding arrest warrant.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 940, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

818.

In any case in which a peace officer serves upon a person a warrant of arrest for a misdemeanor offense under the Vehicle Code or under any local ordinance relating to stopping, standing, parking, or operation of a motor vehicle and where no written promise to appear has been filed and the warrant states on its face that a citation may be used in lieu of physical arrest, the peace officer may, instead of taking the person before a magistrate, prepare a notice to appear and release the person on his promise to appear, as prescribed by Sections 853. 6 through 853.8 of the Penal Code. Issuance of a notice to appear and securing of a promise to appear shall be
 deemed a compliance with the directions of the warrant, and the peace officer issuing such notice to appear and obtaining such promise to appear shall endorse on the warrant “Section 818, Penal Code, complied with” and return the warrant to the magistrate who issued it.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 336, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

819.

(a) It is the public policy of the state that an out-of-state arrest warrant for an individual based on violating another state’s law against providing, receiving, or allowing their child to receive gender-affirming health care or gender-affirming mental health care is the lowest law enforcement priority.

(b) California law enforcement agencies shall not knowingly make or participate in the arrest or participate in any